California, session 20252026, SB325.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 635 of the Penal Code is amended to read:635. (a) Every A person who manufactures, assembles, sells, offers for sale, advertises for sale, possesses, transports, imports, or furnishes to another any person a device which that is primarily or exclusively designed or intended for eavesdropping upon the communication of another, another person, or any a device which that is primarily or exclusively designed or intended for the unauthorized interception or reception of communications between cellular radio telephones or between a cellular radio telephone and a landline telephone in violation of Section 632.5, or communications between cordless telephones or between a cordless telephone and a landline telephone in violation of Section 632.6, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), by imprisonment in the a county jail not exceeding one year, or in the state prison, or by both that fine and imprisonment. If the A person who has previously been convicted of a violation of violating this section, the person section shall be punished by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment in the a county jail not exceeding one year, or in the state prison, or by both that fine and imprisonment.(b) This section does not apply to either of the following:(1) An act otherwise prohibited by this section when performed by any of the following:(A) A communication utility or an officer, employee or agent thereof of a communication utility for the purpose of construction, maintenance, conduct, or operation of, or otherwise incident to the use of, the services or facilities of the that utility.(B) A state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency or an agency of the federal government.(C) A person engaged in selling devices specified in subdivision (a) for use by, or resale to, agencies an agency of a foreign government under terms approved by the federal government, a communication utilities, utility, state, county, or municipal law enforcement agencies, or agencies of the agency, or a federal government. government agency.(2) Possession by a subscriber to communication utility service of a device specified in subdivision (a) furnished by the utility pursuant to its tariffs.